District of Columbia statutes.
22-3803

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(1)

The term “sexual psychopath” means a person, not insane, who by a course of repeated misconduct in sexual matters has evidenced such lack of power to control his or her sexual impulses as to be dangerous to other persons because he or she is likely to attack or otherwise inflict injury, loss, pain, or other evil on the objects of his or her desire.

(2)

The term “court” means a court in the District of Columbia having jurisdiction of criminal offenses or delinquent acts.

(3)

The term “patient” means a person with respect to whom there has been filed with the clerk of any court a statement in writing setting forth facts tending to show that such person is a sexual psychopath.

(4)

The term “criminal proceeding” means a proceeding in any court against a person for a criminal offense, and includes all stages of such a proceeding from the time the person is indicted, charged by an information, or charged with a delinquent act, to the entry of judgment, or, if the person is granted probation, the completion of the period of probation.

June 9, 1948, 62 Stat. 347, ch. 428, title II, § 201
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 157(c)(1)(A), (B)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 20(a), 41 DCR 1639
This section is referenced in § 22-4001 and § 22-4002.
1981 Ed., § 22-3503.
1973 Ed., § 22-3503.